Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8327.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 27 of the General Laws entitled "INSURANCE" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 84
PRIMARY CARE ADMINISTRATIVE FAIRNESS ACT
27-84-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Primary Care Administrative Fairness
Act."
27-84-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Covered services" means health care services for which a payer provides
reimbursement under a participating provider agreement.
(2) “ICD-10” means International Classification of Diseases, 10th revision.
(3) "Payer" means any health insurer, health maintenance organization, managed care
organization, or Medicare Advantage plan doing business in this state.
27-84-3. Prohibition on uncompensated referral coordination.
No payer shall require a primary care provider to perform uncompensated referral
coordination services, including preparation of documentation, submission of prior authorizations,
communication with specialists or insurers, tracking of approvals, or transmission of materials.
27-84-4. Payer obligations for referral coordination.

A payer shall either:
(1) Eliminate prior authorization requirements for all primary care initiated referrals; or
(2) Reimburse the primary care practice at reasonable attributable costs for each referral
coordination service, paid separately and unbundled from evaluation and management payments or
capitated payments, including Medicare Advantage payments.
27-84-5. Coverage based on any recognized ICD-10 code.
If a laboratory service is covered under any ICD-10 code recognized by the payer, coverage
shall not be denied solely because of the specific diagnostic code submitted by the ordering
physician.
27-84-6. Prohibition on resubmissions.
A payer shall not require a physician or practice to resubmit a claim, modify a code, or
provide additional justification solely to satisfy the payer’s internal coding preferences when the
service is otherwise covered.
27-84-7. Contract provisions void.
Any contract provision that violates this chapter shall be void and unenforceable.
27-84-8. Enforcement.
The office of the health insurance commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this chapter
and shall:
(1) Require payers to update participating provider agreements no later than January 1,
2027;
(2) Review payer policies for compliance with this chapter;
(3) Void any payer contract provisions that are inconsistent with the requirements of this
chapter; and
(4) On and after January 1, 2028 publish an annual report on referral volumes,
reimbursements for referral coordination services, and laboratory claim denial rates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027
========
LC006081
========
LC006081 - Page 2 of 3